Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.250

Participation in contracts by qualified minority and women-owned and controlled businesses—Data—Contact people—Reports.

(1) For the purpose of annual reporting on progress required by this chapter, each state agency and educational institution shall submit data to the office and the office of minority and women's business enterprises on the participation by qualified minority and women-owned and controlled businesses in the agency's or institution's contracts and other related information requested by the director. The director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises shall determine the content and format of the data and the reporting schedule, which must be at least annually.

(2) The office must develop and maintain a list of contact people at each state agency and educational institution who are able to present to hearings of the appropriate committees of the legislature its progress in carrying out the purposes of chapter 39.19 RCW.

(3) The office must submit a report aggregating the data received from each state agency and educational institution, and the information identified and actions taken under RCW 39.19.060(3) and 39.19.090(4), to the legislature and the governor.

[ 2021 c 160 s 7; 2019 c 434 s 4; 2009 c 348 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2019 c 434: See note following RCW 35.23.352.